Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202624-209
Nebraska Appellate Courts Online Library; repository of decisions of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals; distribution of electronic opinions; Supreme Court Reports Cash Fund; created; termination.

(1) The Nebraska Appellate Courts Online Library shall be the repository for the published judicial opinions of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals which have been designated for permanent publication. All previous official bound and printed volumes of the appellate courts' opinions shall be made available on the Nebraska Appellate Courts Online Library. Other distribution of such electronic opinions shall be as directed by the Supreme Court.

(2) The Supreme Court Reports Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund terminates on July 1, 2026, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to the General Fund.

Laws 1879, § 20, p. 86;

Laws 1901, c. 24, § 2, p. 330;

Laws 1907, c. 41, § 1, p. 179;

R.S.1913, § 1147;

Laws 1921, c. 213, § 1, p. 752;

C.S.1922, § 1076;

Laws 1923, c. 129, § 1, p. 322;

C.S.1929, § 27-209;

Laws 1937, c. 59, § 1, p. 236;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 27-209;

R.S.1943, § 24-209;

Laws 1947, c. 185, § 3, p. 611;

Laws 1957, c. 210, § 1, p. 742;

Laws 1961, c. 101, § 1, p. 332;

Laws 1961, c. 243, § 1, p. 724;

Laws 1963, c. 303, § 1, p. 897;

Laws 1963, c. 129, § 1, p. 496;

Laws 1971, LB 10, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 13;

Laws 1977, LB 9, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 377, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 271, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 5;

Laws 1984, LB 848, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 498, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 750, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 33;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 271, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB301, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB799, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB952, § 2.
July 1, 2026
In absence of copyright, printer could publish and sell copies of Supreme Court Reports, even though plates belonged to state. State v. State Journal Co., 77 Neb. 752, 110 N.W. 763 (1906), affirming 75 Neb. 275, 106 N.W. 434 (1905).

Supreme Court Reports belong to office and not to judge personally. Clifford v. Hall County, 60 Neb. 506, 83 N.W. 661 (1900).